Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 1 General Provisions

47-16-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Board” means the Board of Commissioners of the Sheriffs’ Retirement Fund of Georgia.

“Fund” means the Sheriffs’ Retirement Fund of Georgia.

“Member” means a member of the Sheriffs’ Retirement Fund of Georgia.

History.

Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47.